North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 1. General Provisions for State Administration.
2004-124, s. 33.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2004-2005 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2004-2005 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2004-124, s. 33.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2005-247, s. 3, has been codified as
G.S. 115D-5(q), at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2005-198, which added subsection (p), in s. 5, provides, in part that the act expires July 1, 2011.
Session Laws
2007-484, s. 35, amended Session Laws
2005-198, s. 5, by deleting the sunset provision.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 8.3(a)-(g), as amended by Session Laws
2006-66, s. 8.1(a), (b), provides: “(a) The minimum salaries for community college faculty shall be based on the following education levels:

“(1) Vocational Diploma/Certificate or Less. — This education level includes faculty members who are high school graduates, have vocational diplomas, or have completed one year of college.

“(2) Associate Degree or Equivalent. — This education level includes faculty members who have an associate degree or have completed two or more years of college but have no degree.

“(3) Bachelors Degree.

“(4) Masters Degree or Education Specialist.

“(5) Doctoral Degree.

“(b) For the 2005-2006 school year, the minimum salaries for nine-month, full-time, curriculum community college faculty shall be as follows:

Education Level
Minimum Salary

2005-2006

Vocational Diploma/

Certificate or Less
$29,932

“The pro rata hourly rate of the minimum salary for each education level shall be used to determine the minimum salary for part-time faculty members.

(b1) For the 2006-2007 school year, the minimum salaries for nine-month, full-time, curriculum community college faculty shall be as follows:

Education Level
Minimum Salary

2006-2007

Vocational Diploma/Certificate or Less
$31,728

Associate Degree or Equivalent
$32,195

Bachelors Degree
$34,220

Masters Degree or Education

Specialist
$36,016

Doctoral Degree
$38,607

No full-time faculty member shall earn less than the minimum salary for his or her education level.

The pro rata hourly rate of the minimum salary for each education level shall be used to determine the minimum salary for part-time faculty members.

“(c)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to encourage community colleges to make faculty salaries a priority and to reward colleges that have taken steps to achieve the national average, therefore:

“a. If the average faculty salary at a community college is one hundred percent (100%) or more of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to eight percent (8%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“b. If the average faculty salary at a community college is at least ninety-five percent (95%) but less than one hundred percent (100%) of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to six percent (6%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“c. If the average faculty salary at a community college is at least ninety percent (90%) but less than ninety-five percent (95%) of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to five percent (5%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“d. If the average faculty salary at a community college is at least eighty-five percent (85%) but less than ninety percent (90%) of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to three percent (3%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“e. If the average faculty salary at a community college is eighty-five percent (85%) or less of the national average community college faculty salary, the college may transfer up to two percent (2%) of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries.

“Except as provided by subdivision (2) of this subsection, a community college shall not transfer a greater percentage of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries than is authorized by this subsection.

“(2) With the approval of the State Board of Community Colleges, a community college at which the average faculty salary is eighty-five percent (85%) or less of the national average may transfer a greater percentage of the State funds allocated to it for faculty salaries than is authorized by sub-subdivision e. of subdivision (1) of this subsection. The State Board shall approve the transfer only for purposes that directly affect student services.

“(3) A local community college may use all State funds allocated to it except for Literacy Funds and Funds for New and Expanding Industry Training to increase faculty salaries.

“(d) As used in this section:

“(1) ‘Average faculty salary at a community college’ means the total nine-month salary from all sources of all nine-month, full-time, curriculum faculty at the college, as determined by the North Carolina Community College System on October 1 of each year.

“(2) ‘National average community college faculty salary’ means the nine-month, full-time, curriculum salary average, as published by the Integrated Postsecondary Education Data System (IPEDS), for the most recent year for which data are available.

“(e) The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

“(f) The State Board of Community Colleges shall report to the appropriations subcommittees on education, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Office of State Budget and Management by December 1, 2005, and every year thereafter through December 1, 2009, on the implementation of this section.

“(g) For the 2005-2006 fiscal year, funds appropriated in this act for salary increases shall be used to increase faculty and professional staff salaries by an average of two percent (2%). These increases are in addition to other salary increases provided for in this act and shall be calculated on the average salaries prior to the issuance of the compensation increase. For the 2006-2007 fiscal year, funds appropriated in this act for salary increases shall be used to increase faculty and professional staff annual salaries by six percent (6%). Colleges may provide additional increases from funds available.

“The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt rules to ensure that these funds are used only to move faculty and professional staff to the respective national averages. These funds shall not be transferred by the State Board or used for any other budget purpose by the community colleges.”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2005’.”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 46.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only
to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 46.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 7.21(a), provides: “The State Board of Education shall:

“(1) Review the lateral entry program and identify and remove from it barriers to the lateral entry of skilled individuals from the private sector into the teaching profession;

“(2) Reduce the coursework requirements for lateral entry by consolidating the required competencies into fewer courses and fewer semester hours of coursework; and

“(3) Provide additional opportunities for individuals to complete coursework online and at community colleges.”

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 7.21(b), provides: “The State Board of Education shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by January 15, 2010, on its implementation of this section.”

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 8.24, as amended by Session Laws
2010-31, s. 8.7, provides: “The management flexibility reduction for the North Carolina Community College System shall be allocated by the State Board of Community Colleges in a manner that accounts for the unique needs of each college and provides for the equitable distribution of funds to the institutions consistent with
G.S. 115D-5(a). Before taking reductions to instructional budgets, the community colleges shall consider reducing budgets for senior and middle management personnel and for programs that have both low-enrollment and low-postgraduate success. Colleges shall minimize the impact on student support services and on the retraining of dislocated workers. Colleges shall not reduce funding for the Small Business Centers. The community colleges shall also review their institutional funds to determine whether there are monies available in those funds that can be used to assist with operating costs before taking reductions in instructional budgets.”

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2009’.”

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 28.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2009-2011 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 28.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 7.24(a)-(h), as amended by Session Laws
2010-123, s. 3.1, provides: “(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to implement a funding formula in the 2011-2012 school year that will provide money to local school administrative units for the purpose of paying the tuition of high school students taking higher education courses for which tuition is required.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to eliminate the tuition waiver for courses taken by high school students at community colleges set forth in
G.S. 115D-5(b) effective July 1, 2011, except for the waiver that applies to students in cooperative innovative high school programs established pursuant to Part 9 of Article 16 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.
Tuition shall continue to be waived for students in cooperative innovative high school programs.

“(c) For the 2011-2012 school year, the North Carolina Community College System General Fund appropriations shall be reduced by an amount calculated by multiplying the number of FTE high school students for whom tuition is required by the per capita budgeted receipts for community college curriculum instruction.
This amount of funds shall be transferred to the State Board of Education for distribution to the local school administrative units.

“(d) For the 2011-2012 school year, the General Fund appropriation for Learn and Earn Online shall be available to the State Board of Education for distribution to the local school administrative units.

“(e) For the 2011-2012 school year, the State Public School Fund shall be reduced by an amount calculated by (i) subtracting the per capita budgeted receipts for community college curriculum instruction from the in-State tuition amount per FTE and (ii) multiplying the result by the number of FTE high school students for whom tuition is required. This amount of funds shall be available to the State Board of Education for distribution to the local school administrative units.

“(f) The amounts transferred to the State Board of Education under subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section shall be distributed to local school administrative units based on the pro rata share of each local school administrative unit’s number of FTE high school students for whom tuition is required.

“(g) The amounts allocated to local school administrative units under this section shall not be transferred to other uses and shall only be available for paying the tuition of high school students taking higher education courses for which tuition is required.

“(h) Beginning with the 2010-2011 school year, courses provided in (i) general education, except for mathematics, science, and technology, (ii) physical education, and (iii) college success skills courses offered to high school students shall no longer generate State funding through budget FTE or receive reimbursements from the Department of Public Instruction.
If an institute of higher education offers these courses to high school students, the colleges may charge an amount sufficient to cover the costs of the courses.

“This subsection does not apply to courses provided to students of Early and Middle College High Schools, as established under Part 9 of Article 16 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 8.3(a)-(c), as amended by Session Laws
2019-235, s. 3.4(a), provides: “(a) Funds appropriated for community college courses for prison inmates shall be used only for inmates in State prisons.
The first priority for the use of these funds shall be to restore the FTE for basic skills courses to the FY 2008-2009 level.
Funds not needed for this purpose may be used for continuing education and curriculum courses related to job skills training.
These funds shall not be used for Associate of Arts, Associate of Science, or Associate of General Education degrees.

“(b) Courses in federal prisons shall not earn regular budget full-time equivalents, but may be offered on a self-supporting basis.

“(c) The Department of Correction and the Community Colleges System Office shall report to the 2011 General Assembly on:

“(1) The implementation of the new funding structure and requirements.

“(2) Strategies for implementing their recommendations to:

“a. Enhance measurable goals, objectives, and outcomes.

“b. Enhance and standardize data collection.

“c. Strengthen the continuum of programming from entry to exit, based on assessment of skills and needs.

“d. Give individuals the opportunity to use specific skills through work assignments that meet system needs.

“e. Tailor programs to specific inmate needs.

“f. Increase Cognitive Behavioral Interventions (CBI) courses.

“g.
Develop an offender-specific human resources development course.

“h. Explore additional funding sources.

“i.
Explore federal grant for wiring courses.

“(3) Strategies for reasonably limiting the number of courses an individual takes while in prison.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2010’.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 32.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2010-2011 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2010-2011 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 32.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 8.7(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Notwithstanding Section 7.1A of S.L. 2011-145, as amended by Section 13 of S.L. 2011-391, and any other provision of law, the State Board of Education and the State Board of Community Colleges shall approve the Gateway to College program at Durham Technical Community College as a Career and College pathway pilot program. This program concurrently provides high school and college education to high school students who have previously dropped out.

“(b) The State Board of Community Colleges shall include curriculum coursework, including developmental course work, associated with this program when computing the budget FTE for Durham Technical Community College in the 2012-2013 fiscal year.

“(c) Durham Technical Community College shall report to the Education Appropriation Subcommittees of the House of Representatives and the Senate by March 1, 2013, on student outcomes under the program and on the actual cost of the program, including administrative expenses incurred by Durham Public Schools and Durham Technical Community College.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 8.10, provides: “Notwithstanding
G.S. 115D-5(o), the State Board of Community Colleges shall approve the Kimbrell Campus multicampus site of Gaston College.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2012.’ ”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 27.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2012-2013 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2012-2013 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 27.7, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 10.4(a) and (c), provides: “(a) Beginning with the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, community colleges shall receive funding based on the number of full-time equivalent (FTE) students enrolled in curriculum, continuing education, and Basic Skills courses, by tiered funding level. Community colleges shall calculate this enrollment as the higher of the current year’s total enrollment or the average enrollment of the last two academic years.

“The State Board of Community Colleges shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by February 1, 2014, on the use of nonrecurring funds appropriated to it to phase in this new enrollment funding model.

“(c) The State Board of Community Colleges shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by October 1, 2014, on FTE for the 2014 summer term.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 10.4(d), made subsection (v), as added by Session Laws
2013-360, s. 10.4(b), applicable beginning with the summer 2014 term.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 10.15(a), effective July 1, 2015, repealed subsection (m). Session Laws
2015-241, s. 10.6(a), repealed Section 10.15(a) of Session laws 2013-360, effective July 1, 2015.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 10.15(c), as amended by Session Laws
2013-363, s. 3.14, provides: “A study of the program audit function under
G.S. 115D-5(m) shall be conducted by a committee, located administratively in the Community Colleges System Office, composed of the following 12 members:

“(1) The Community Colleges System Office Chief Financial Officer shall serve as a nonvoting member.

“(2) Three State Board of Community College members appointed by the chair of the State Board of Community Colleges.

“(3) Three college presidents appointed by the North Carolina Association of Community College Presidents.

“(4) Three college board of trustee members appointed by the chair of the North Carolina Association of Community College Trustees.

“(5) The State Chief Information Officer or designee shall serve as a nonvoting member.

“(6) The State Auditor or designee shall serve as a nonvoting member.

“The committee shall elect a chair from its members. The committee shall meet upon the call of the chair. A quorum of the committee shall be a majority of the members.

“The committee shall determine how program audit procedures may be streamlined to minimize the administrative burden on the institutions being audited and how funding mechanisms may be changed to reduce reliance on contact hours. The committee shall seek input from community college staff members who are responsible for assistance with the program audits to study the problems associated with the program audit function and potential resolutions for those issues. The committee shall report the results of its study and recommendations to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by January 1, 2015.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 11.17(a), (b), as amended by Session Laws
2013-363, s. 3.16, provides: “(a) The Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, in conjunction with the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and the State Board of Community Colleges, shall study the feasibility of establishing an alternative undergraduate admission program to be known as the North Carolina Guaranteed Admission Program (NC GAP). The goals of NC GAP shall be to encourage and assist more students to obtain a baccalaureate degree within a shorter time period; to provide students with a college education at significantly lower costs for both the student and the State; to help decrease the amount of debt resulting from loans that a student may owe upon graduation; to provide a student with an interim degree that may increase a student’s job opportunities if the student chooses not to continue postsecondary education; and to provide easier access to academic counseling that will assist a student in selecting coursework that reflects the student’s educational and career goals and helps the student succeed academically.

“NC GAP shall be designed as an alternative admission program for students who apply for admission to a constituent institution and satisfy the admission criteria but whose academic credentials are not as competitive as other students admitted to the institution. A student admitted to a constituent institution through NC GAP must agree to defer enrollment at the institution until the student earns an associate degree from one of the State’s community colleges. Counseling and assistance shall be provided by the community college to any student in NC GAP to help the student in selecting coursework that reflects the student’s educational and career goals and that provides a smooth transition from the community college to the constituent institution.

“Once awarded the associate degree from the community college, the student is entitled to admission as a junior at the constituent institution.

“Each constituent institution of higher education would be directed to establish NC GAP as part of its undergraduate admission program.

“(b) The Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee shall report its findings and recommendations regarding NC GAP, together with any recommended legislation, to the 2014 Regular Session of the 2013 General Assembly, upon its convening. The report shall include a comprehensive description of the proposed program, including the criteria that would be used to determine which students would be required to participate in the program as a condition of enrollment and the academic counseling that would need to be available to help students in NC GAP succeed academically.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2013.’ ”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 38.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 38.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2013-382, s. 9.1(b), provides: “The following entities and positions created by Chapter 126 of the General Statutes are hereby renamed by this act:

“(1) The State Personnel Commission is renamed the ‘North Carolina Human Resources Commission.’

“(2) The Office of State Personnel is renamed the ‘North Carolina Office of State Human Resources.’

“(3) The State Personnel Director is renamed the ‘Director of the North Carolina Office of State Human Resources.’ ”

Session Laws
2013-382, s. 9.1(c), provides: “Modification of References. — The Revisor of Statutes shall delete any references in the General Statutes to the State Personnel Act, State Personnel Commission, the State Personnel Director, and the Office of State Personnel (or any derivatives thereof) and substitute references to the North Carolina Human Resources Act, the State Human Resources Commission, the Director of the Office of State Human Resources, and the Office of Human Resources (or the appropriate derivative thereof) to effectuate the renaming set forth in this section wherever conforming changes are necessary.”

Session Laws
2013-382, s. 9.2, provides: “No action or proceeding pending on the effective date of this section [August 21, 2013], brought by or against the State Personnel Commission, the Director of the Office of State Personnel, or the Office of State Personnel, shall be affected by any provision of this section, but the same may be prosecuted or defended in the new name of the Commission, Director, and Office. In these actions and proceedings, the renamed Commission, Director, or Office shall be substituted as a party upon proper application to the courts or other public bodies.”

Session Laws
2013-382, s. 9.3, provides: “Any business or other matter undertaken or commanded by the former State Personnel Commission, State Personnel Director, or Office of State Personnel regarding any State program, office, or contract or pertaining to or connected with their respective functions, powers, obligations, and duties that are pending on the date this act becomes effective [August 21, 2013] may be conducted and completed by the Commission, Director, or Office in the same manner and under the same terms and conditions and with the same effect as if conducted and completed by the formerly named commission, director, or office.”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 10.2, provides: “The State Board of Community Colleges shall develop a process for periodically reviewing and revising how courses and programs are classified into tiers in the enrollment funding model. The process shall be developed by March 1, 2015, and reported to the Office of State Budget and Management and the Fiscal Research Division of the North Carolina General Assembly.

“The State Board of Community Colleges shall identify those courses and programs in high-need areas and may suggest any revisions to the model. These revisions shall be submitted as part of their budget requests for the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2016-57, s. 2(g), provides: “The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a policy that requires the community colleges within the North Carolina Community College System to accept only the residency classification jointly developed by The University of North Carolina, the North Carolina Community College System, and the State Education Assistance Authority in consultation with the North Carolina Independent Colleges and Universities as required by this act under the coordinated and centralized process for determining residency for tuition purposes.”

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 10.3(b), made subdivision (b)(16), as added by Session Laws
2016-94, s. 10.3(a), applicable beginning with the 2016 fall academic term.

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 10.4(c), made subdivision (b)(2a), as added by Session Laws
2016-94, s. 10.4(a), applicable beginning with the 2016 fall academic term.

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2016.’ ”

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 9.8(b), made the rewriting of subdivision (b)(16) by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 9.8(a), applicable retroactively beginning with the 2016 fall academic term.

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 9.10(d), made the deletion of “curriculum” preceding “courses” in subdivision (b)(12) of this section by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 9.10(a), and subdivision (b2), as added by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 9.10(c), applicable beginning with the 2017-2018 academic year.

Session Laws
2017-155, s. 6, made subsection (y), as added by Session Laws
2017-155, s. 2(a), effective July 21, 2017, and applicable beginning with the 2017 fall academic semester.

Subsection (y) was originally added by Session Laws 2017-155. s. 2(a), as subsection (x). It was redesignated as subsection (y) at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes because of the addition of another subsection (x) by Session Laws
2017-57, s. 7.22(g).

Session Laws
2017-186, s. 3(a), provides: “The Revisor of Statutes shall change any additional references in the General Statutes to the ‘Division of Adult Correction’ to the ‘Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice 2019.” Pursuant to that provision, “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” was substituted for “Division of Adult Correction” in the second paragraph in subsection (c1).

Session Laws
2017-189, s. 7(a) made the amendment to subsection (p) by Session Laws
2017-189, s. 6(g), effective July 27, 2017, and applicable beginning with the 2017-2018 school year.

Session Laws
2017-155, s. 2(b), provides: “The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt the policies set out in
G.S. 115D-5(y), as enacted by subsection (a) of this section, by July 1, 2017, and shall direct each community college to implement those policies beginning with the 2017 fall academic term.”

“Article 1 of Chapter 17C” has been substituted for “Chapter 17C” in this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes to conform to Session Laws
2018-5, s. 17.1(a).

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2018.’ ”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 39.7, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 8.3(a), as amended by Session Laws
2020-54, s. 1, was codified as subsection (c3) of this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 8.3(b), as amended by Session Laws
2019-235, s. 3.4(a), was codified as subsection (c2) of this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws
2019-235, s. 3.2(b), made sub-subdivision (b)(2)f1., as added by Session Laws
2019-235, s. 3.2(a), applicable beginning with the 2019-2020 academic year.

Session Laws
2019-235, s. 3.4(c), provides: “Beginning with the 2019-2020 academic year, community college courses offered in local jails shall earn regular budget full-time equivalents.”

Session Laws
2019-235, s. 5.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2019-235, s. 5.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2020-3, s. 2.1, as amended by Session Laws
2020-49, s. 3(a), provides: “For the purposes of this Part, the following definitions apply:

“(1) Authority. — State Education Assistance Authority.

“(2) Coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) emergency. — The period beginning March 10, 2020, and continuing until the Governor signs an executive order rescinding Executive Order No. 116 (Declaration of a State of Emergency to Coordinate Response and Protective Actions to Prevent the Spread of COVID-19).

“(3) Federal testing waiver. — The testing waiver granted to the State Board of Education by the United States Department of Education for the 2019-2020 school year, pursuant to section 8401(b) of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (ESEA), as amended, which, pursuant to

G.S. 115C-174.11

, eliminated the collection of certain student assessment data for the 2019-2020 school year.

“(4) Modified calendar school. — A school that a local board designated as having a modified calendar for the 2003-2004 school year or any school that was part of a planned program in the 2003-2004 school year for a system of modified calendar schools, so long as the school operates under a modified calendar.

“(5) State Board. — The State Board of Education.

“(6) Year-round school. — A school with a single or multi-track instructional calendar that was adopted prior to March 1, 2020, and provides instructional days in compliance with Section 2.11(b)(1) of this Part throughout the entire school calendar year, beginning July 1 and ending June 30, by utilizing at least one of the following plans:

“a. A plan dividing students into four groups and requiring each group to be in school for assigned and staggered quarters each school calendar year.

“b. A plan providing students be scheduled to attend an average of between 44 and 46 instructional days followed by an average of between 15 and 20 days of vacation, repeated throughout the school calendar year.

“c. A plan dividing the school calendar year into five nine-week sessions of classes and requiring each student to attend four assigned and staggered sessions out of the five nine-week sessions to complete the student’s instructional year.”

Session Laws
2020-3, s. 2.2, provides: “The purpose of this Part is to clarify or modify certain requirements in consideration of actions and circumstances related to the COVID-19 emergency, including, but not limited to, the federal testing waiver and the closure of schools for in-person instruction during the 2019-2020 school year.”

Session Laws
2020-3, s. 2.27, provides: “Notwithstanding
G.S. 115D-5(b)(16), a student who is unable to continue participation in a pre-apprenticeship or apprenticeship program due to the COVID-19 emergency may be eligible for a tuition waiver for community college courses in the student’s documented plan of study related to a job-specific occupational or technical skill until December 31, 2020.”

Session Laws
2020-3, s. 5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2021-130, s. 11(a), provides: “(a) Notwithstanding
G.S. 20-11(n),
115C-12(28),
115C-218.70,
115C-288(k),
115C-566, and
115D-5(a3), a person required to sign a driving eligibility certificate shall issue the driving eligibility certificate without requiring the person to whom it is issued to be making progress toward obtaining a high school diploma or its equivalent, and no school authority shall notify the Division of Motor Vehicles that a person no longer meets the requirements for a driving eligibility certificate because the person is not making progress toward obtaining a high school diploma or its equivalent.” Session Laws
2021-130, s. 11(b), provides that Session Laws
2021-130, s. 11(a), expires effective January 30, 2022.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 6.3(c), made the amendments to subsection (x) of this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 6.3(a), applicable beginning with the 2021-2022 academic year.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to sub-subdivision (b)(2)g. of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(
lll
), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 8.4, effective July 1, 2004, substituted “September 1 of each year” for “March 1 and October 1 of each year” in subsection (i).

Session Laws 2005-193, s. 1, effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (b), inserted “including students in early college and middle college high school programs,” in the final proviso.

Session Laws 2005-198, s. 3, effective July 19, 2005, added subsection (p).

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 8.4(a), effective July 1, 2005, recodified subsections (d), (i) and (k), as subsections (a), (c), and (b) of

G.S. 115D-5.1

, respectively.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 8.6, effective July 1, 2005, rewrote subsection (m).

Session Laws 2005-395, s. 25, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “G.S. 93A-4.1” for “G.S. 93A-4A” in subsection (h).

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 37, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, in the second paragraph of subsection (f), deleted “and the Advisory Budget Commission” following “Commission on Governmental Operations,” and made a minor stylistic change.

Session Laws 2007-154, s. 2(a), effective June 29, 2007, added subsection (r).

Session Laws 2007-484, s. 29.(a), effective August 30, 2007, substituted “capital improvement projects” for “buildings, building plans” in the second paragraph in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2008-107, ss. 8.11, 8.17, 8.18, effective July 1, 2008, in subsection (b), made a minor grammatical change and inserted “and elementary and secondary school employees enrolled in courses in first aid or cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR)” preceding “Provided further, tuition”; and added subsections (s) and (t).

Session Laws 2009-208, s. 1, effective June 26, 2009, in subsection (m), deleted the last sentence, which read: “The State Board shall assess a twenty-five percent (25%) fiscal penalty in addition to the audit exception on all audits of both dollars and student membership hours excepted when the audit exceptions result from nonprocessing errors.”

Session Laws 2009-451, ss. 8.8, 8.9, and 8.11(d), effective July 1, 2009, in subsection (o), substituted “December 1” for “October 1” in the last sentence; and deleted subsection (q), which read: “The State Board of Community Colleges shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on October 1 of each year on the use of community college facilities by private businesses”; and in the fourth sentence in subsection (b) inserted “for up to six hours of credit per academic semester” and substituted “age 65 or older who are qualified as legal residents of North Carolina” for “attending institutions operating under this Chapter as set forth in Chapter 115B of the General Statutes, Tuition Waiver for Senior Citizens.”

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 8.11(e), effective July 1, 2010, deleted “prison inmates” preceding “members of the North Carolina State Defense Militia” near the end of the third sentence.

Session Laws 2009-570, s. 42, effective August 28, 2009, substituted “costs” for “course” in clause (ii) of subsection (s).

Session Laws 2009-575, s. 5, effective July 1, 2009, in subsection (b), in the next-to-last sentence, inserted “instruction and 96 contact hours of noncredit instruction.”

Session Laws 2010-31, ss. 8.3(d), 8.4(a), and 8.11, effective July 1, 2010, subdivided and rewrote subsection (b), in part by inserting subdivision and clause designations, adding subdivisions (b)(13) and (b)(14) and making related changes; added the second sentence in subsection (c); and added the last paragraph in subsection (o).

Session Laws 2010-112, s. 2, effective July 20, 2010, and applicable beginning with the 2010-2011 academic year, added subsection (u).

Session Laws 2010-113, s. 1, effective July 1, 2010, added the second and third sentences in the second paragraph in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2011-145, ss. 8.2(b), 8.12(a), 8.12(b), and 8.13, effective July 1, 2011, rewrote subsection (b) to the extent that a detailed comparison is impracticable; added subsection (b1); deleted the last sentence of subsection (j), which read: “The State Board shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on expenditures from the State Board Reserve Fund on January 15 and June 15 each year”; and added the first sentence in the last paragraph of subsection (o).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (k), and (
l